src/morphology/stems/altstem-nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_KINNER
!! € kinner
0:ner       N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tere    N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tere    N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:teree   N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ter       N_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:tere    N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:ner       N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:tere    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:teree   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0:ter       N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:tere    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:ner       N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:ter       N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:tere    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:tere    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ter       N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:tere    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:tere    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ner       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:tere    N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:tere      N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:teree     N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ner       N_COMPOUND_TEN ;
0:ter       N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:tere      N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:tere      N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_KANNEL
!! € kannel
0:nel       N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tele    N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tele    N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:telee   N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:tel       N_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:tele    N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:nel       N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:tele    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:telee   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0:tel       N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:tele    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:nel       N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:tel       N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:tele    N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:tele    N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:tel       N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:tele    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:tele    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:nel       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:tele    N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:tele      N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:telee     N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:nel       N_COMPOUND_TEN ;
0:tel       N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:tele      N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:tele      N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_MANNER
!! € manner
0:ner       N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tere    N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tere    N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:teree   N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ter       N_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:tere    N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:ner       N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:tere    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:teree   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0:ter       N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:tere    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:ner       N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:ter       N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:tere    N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:tere    N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ter       N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:tere    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:tere    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ner       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:tere    N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:tere      N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:teree     N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ner       N_COMPOUND_TEN ;
0:ter       N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:tere      N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:tere      N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_PIENNAR
!! € manner
0:nar       N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tare    N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tare    N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:taree   N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:tar       N_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:tare    N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:nar       N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:tare    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:taree   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0:tar       N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:tare    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:nar       N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:tar       N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:tare    N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:tare    N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:tar       N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:tare    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:tare    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:nar       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:tere    N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:tere      N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:teree     N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ner       N_COMPOUND_TEN ;
0:ter       N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:tere      N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:tere      N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_AUER
!! € auer
0:er       N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tere    N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tere    N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:teree   N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ter       N_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:tere    N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:er       N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:tere    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:teree   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0:ter       N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:tere    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:er       N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:ter       N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:tere    N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:tere    N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ter       N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:tere    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:tere    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:er       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:tere   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:tere     N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:teree    N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:er       N_COMPOUND_TEN ;
0:ter      N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:tere     N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:tere     N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_VERI
!! € veri
!! € verta
!! $ vertä
0:i       N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:e       N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:e     N_FRONT_PLURALS   ;
0       N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:e       N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0     N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0     N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:i       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:e       N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0       N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_MERI
!! € meri
!! € merta
!! $ mertä
0:i   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:e N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0 N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:e N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0 N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0 N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:i   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_UROS
!! € uros
!! € uroksen
!! € uroon
0:s   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:kse   N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:o     N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ks    N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0       N_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:s   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:kse   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:o     N_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN    ;
0:ks    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0       N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA    ;
0:ks    N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:s       N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0       N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN    ;
0       N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN   ;
0:ks    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0       N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN   ;
0:s   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:kse N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:o   N_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:ks  N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0      N_COMPOUND_IDEN ;
0       N_COMPOUND_ITTEN ;  
0:s   N_COMPOUND_TEN  ;

LEXICON N_VELI
!! € veli
!! € veljeä
!! € veljen
0:i       N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:je       N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0     N_FRONT_PLURALS   ;
0:je       N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:je       N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0     N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0     N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:i       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:i       N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0       N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_AIKA
!! € lanka
!! € lankaa
!! € lankana
!! € langassa
!! € lankoina
!! € lankojen
!! € lankoihin
0:ika  N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ika  N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:ja  N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:iko N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:jo   N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:ika   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:ika   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0:iko  N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:iko  N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ika   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:iko  N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ika   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ja  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:iko   N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:ika   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_POIKA
!! € ruoka
!! € ruokaa
!! € ruokana
!! € ruoassa
!! € ruokina
!! € ruoissa
!! € ruokien
!
!! € ruo’assa
!! € ruo’issa
0:ika   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ika   N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:ja    N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:ik   N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:j   N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:ika   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:ika   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0:ik   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:ik   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:ika   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:ik   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ika   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ja   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ik   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:ika   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

!! Noun forms of numerals with special inflection
!! ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^
!! The numerals are not really nouns in this morphology, for details see
!! numerals_, but some of their compounds are nouns, and the following
!! classes are for those that have special stem or suffix patterns not
!! available with other nouns.
!!
!! The numerals 1 and 2 are in paradigm that is currently left with one other
!! noun, _haaksi_, so nominals with 2 go to that class but 1 gets a new class
!! for being front vowelled. 3 Has its own paradigm, 4 is like koira, 5
!! like hiisi and 6 like kausi.
!! The numerals 7, 8, 9 have their own paradigm, which, other than the
!! nominative having extra n at the end, is same as the tri-syllabic
!! a, ä stems, similarly 10 is quite like sisar with the extra en in nominative.

LEXICON N_AAMUYKSI
!! € aamuyksi
!! € aamuyhtä
!! € aamuyhtenä
0:ksi   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:hte N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:hde N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ks N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:h     N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:hte N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:ks N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:ks N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:ks N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:ksi   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:hde   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ks   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_AAMUKOLME
!! € aamukolme
!! € aamukolmea
!! € aamukolmeen
!! € aamukolmia
!! € aamukolmien
!! € aamukolmiin
0:e    N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:e    N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0    N_BACK_PLURALS ;
0:e    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:e    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0    N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:e    N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0    N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0    N_COMPOUND_IN ;


LEXICON N_AAMUKAHDEKSAN
!! € aamukahdeksan
!! € aamukahdeksaa
!! € aamukahdeksana
!! € aamukahdeksassa
!! € aamukahdeksina
!! € aamukahdeksien
!! € aamukahdeksiin
0:an   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:a   N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0   N_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:a   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:a   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:a   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_AAMUYHDEKSÄN
!! € aamuyhdeksän
!! € aamuyhdeksää
!! € aamuyhdeksänä
!! € aamuyhdeksässä
!! € aamuyhdeksinä
!! € aamuyhdeksien
!! € aamuyhdeksiin
0:än   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0   N_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä      ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN     ;
0   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ä   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ä   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:ä   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;


LEXICON N_AAMUKYMMENEN
!! € aamukymmenen
0:en    N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:e     N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0       N_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0       N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:e     N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0       N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0       N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0       N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0       N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:en    N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:e     N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0       N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0       N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

!! Plurales tantum
!! ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^
!! For some words, the singular forms are rare, odd, or even deemed
!! ungrammatical, these words have separate classes for them.

LEXICON N_AIVOT

























0    N_BACK_PLURALS ;
0    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0    N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0    N_COMPOUND_JEN ;

LEXICON N_PÖKSYT










0    N_FRONT_PLURALS ;
0    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0    N_COMPOUND_JEN ;

LEXICON N_HOUSUT















0    N_BACK_PLURALS ;
0    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0    N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0    N_COMPOUND_JEN ;

LEXICON N_JOUKOT





0:ko      N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:o    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:ko      N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ko      N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ko      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:o       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:ko      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;

LEXICON N_FARKUT





0:ku   N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:u    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:ku   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:ku   N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ku   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ku      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:u       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:ku      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
